North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 18. Parks and Recreation.

§ 160A-350.
Short title.

This Article shall be known and may be cited as the “Recreation Enabling Law.”

History.

1945, c. 1052; 1971, c. 698, s. 1.

Cross References.

As to power of counties to establish parks and recreational programs pursuant to this Article, see

G.S. 153A-444

.

§ 160A-351.
Declaration of State policy.

The lack of adequate recreational programs and facilities is a menace to the morals, happiness, and welfare of the people of this State. Making available recreational opportunities for citizens of all ages is a subject of general interest and concern, and a function requiring appropriate action by both State and local government. The General Assembly therefore declares that the public good and the general welfare of the citizens of this State require adequate recreation programs, that the creation, establishment, and operation of parks and recreation programs is a proper governmental function, and that it is the policy of North Carolina to forever encourage, foster, and provide these facilities and programs for all its citizens.

History.

1945, c. 1052; 1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-352.
Recreation defined.

“Recreation” means activities that are diversionary in character and aid in promoting entertainment, pleasure, relaxation, instruction, and other physical, mental, and cultural development and leisure time experiences.

History.

1945, c. 1052; 1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-353.
Powers.

In addition to any other powers it may possess to provide for the general welfare of its citizens, each county and city in this State shall have authority to:

Establish and conduct a system of supervised recreation;

Set apart lands and buildings for parks, playgrounds, recreational centers, and other recreational programs and facilities;

Acquire real property, either within or without the corporate limits of the city or the boundaries of the county, including water and air rights, for parks and recreation programs and facilities by gift, grant, purchase, lease, exercise of the power of eminent domain, or any other lawful method.

Provide, acquire, construct, equip, operate, and maintain parks, playgrounds, recreation centers, and recreation facilities, including all buildings, structures, and equipment necessary or useful in connection therewith;

Appropriate funds to carry out the provisions of this Article;

Accept any gift, grant, lease, loan, or devise of real or personal property for parks and recreation programs. Devises and gifts may be accepted and held subject to such terms and conditions as may be imposed by the grantor or trustor, except that no county or city may accept or administer any terms that require it to discriminate among its citizens on the basis of race, sex, or religion.

History.

1945, c. 1052; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1973, c. 426, s. 55; 2011-284, s. 115.

Local Modification.

City of Asheville: 1981, c. 23.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-284, s. 115, effective June 24, 2011, deleted “bequest” following “loan” in the first sentence, and deleted “bequests” following “Devises” in the last sentence.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Where Will You Go When the Well Runs Dry? Local Government Ownership and Water Allocation in North Carolina,” see 32 Campbell L. Rev. 51 (2009).

§ 160A-354.
Administration of parks and recreation programs.

A city or county may operate a parks and recreation system as a line department, or it may create a parks and recreation commission and vest in it authority to operate the parks and recreation system.

History.

1945, c. 1052; 1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-355.
Joint parks and recreation systems.

Any two or more units of local government may cooperate in establishing parks and recreation systems as authorized in Article 20, Part 1, of this Chapter.

History.

1945, c. 1052; 1967, c. 1228; 1971, c. 698, s. 1.

§ 160A-356.
Financing parks and recreation.

Each county and city is authorized to expend for its parks and recreation system any of its revenues not otherwise limited as to use by law.

History.

1945, c. 1052; 1971, c. 698, s. 1; 1975, c. 664, s. 12.

§ 160A-357.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1975, c. 664, s. 13.

§§ 160A-358,
160A-359.

Reserved for future codification purposes.